Utah statutes.
41-12a-502.   Accident reports.

(1) (a)  Accident reports required under Section 41-6a-402 shall contain information to enable the department to determine whether the owner and operator of the automobile involved in the accident were in compliance with the security requirement of Section 41-12a-301.

(b)  The information may consist of identifying the policy, bond, or certificate's issuer and number.

(c)  The department may rely upon the accuracy of the information unless it has reason to believe that it is erroneous.

(2) (a)  The operator of a motor vehicle involved in an accident shall, unless physically incapable, make an accident report.

(b)  If the operator is physically incapable, the owner shall, if physically capable, make a report within 10 days of learning of the accident.

(c)  The operator and owner shall furnish any additional relevant information the department reasonably requests.

(3)  Failure to report an accident as required under Section 41-6a-402 shall be punished as set forth under Subsection 41-6a-402(5).



Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

